Wisconsin, session 2025, SB950.
do enact as follows:SB950,11Section 1. 49.155 (1m) (br) of the statutes is amended to read:SB950,2,4249.155 (1m) (br) The child is immunized as required under s. 252.04. 3Notwithstanding s. 252.04 (3), for purposes of this paragraph the immunization 4requirement may only be waived for reasons of health or religion.SB950,25Section 2. 252.04 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:SB950,2,126252.04 (3) The immunization requirement is waived if the student, if an 7adult, or the student’s parent, guardian, or legal custodian submits a written 8statement to the school, child care center, or nursery school objecting to the 9immunization for reasons of health, or religion, or personal conviction. At the time 10any school, child care center, or nursery school notifies a student, parent, guardian, 11or legal custodian of the immunization requirements, it shall inform the person in 12writing of the person’s right to a waiver under this subsection.SB950,2,1313